Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 5 Bill of Rights for Residents of Long-term
Care Facilities

Cross references.

Rights and privileges of patients undergoing treatment for mental illness, §

37-3-140

et seq.

Rights and privileges of persons undergoing habilitation for intellectual or developmental disability, §

37-4-100

et seq.

31-8-100.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Bill of Rights for Residents of Long-term Care Facilities.”

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1901B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1.

31-8-101.
Legislative intent.

The General Assembly finds that persons residing within long-term care facilities are isolated from the community and often lack the means to assert fully their rights as individual citizens. The General Assembly further recognizes the need for these persons to live within the least restrictive environment possible in order to retain their individuality and personal freedom. It is therefore the intent of the General Assembly to preserve the dignity and personal integrity of residents of long-term care facilities through the recognition and declaration of rights safeguarding against encroachments upon each resident’s need for self-determination. It is the further intent of the General Assembly that this article complement and not duplicate or substitute for other survey and inspection programs regarding long-term care facilities.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1903B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1.

31-8-102.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Administrator” means a person, duly licensed as a nursing home administrator under Chapter 27 of Title 43, who operates or manages or is in charge of a long-term care facility.

(1.1)

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Guardian” means a resident’s legal guardian or conservator, or the parent of a minor representative who does not have a duly appointed guardian.

“Long-term care facility” or “facility” means any intermediate care home, skilled nursing home, or intermingled home subject to regulation and licensure by the department.

“Representative” means a person authorized by a resident or his guardian to act for the resident as an official delegate or agent.

“Resident” means any person who is receiving treatment or care in any long-term care facility. Such resident shall be entitled to exercise all rights provided under this article except as limited by a court of competent jurisdiction or by applicable law.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1902B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-12/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-8-103.
Rights of residents generally.

Residents’ rights shall include, but not be limited to, the rights provided in Code Sections 31-8-104 through 31-8-121.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1905B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1.

31-8-104.
Explanation of rights; acknowledgment of explanation; posting of rights at facilities.

Each resident and his guardian or representative, if the resident does not have a guardian, shall be given by the facility a written and oral explanation of the rights, grievance procedures, and enforcement provisions provided for by this article before or at the time of admission to a long-term care facility. Written acknowledgment of the receipt of such explanation by the resident and his guardian or representative shall be made a part of the resident’s file. In addition, each facility shall post written notices of such rights in conspicuous locations in the facility. Such written notices shall be prepared by the department. The notices shall be prepared in type and format which is easily readable by residents and shall describe residents’ rights, grievance procedures, and enforcement provisions provided for by this article.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1906B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1.

31-8-105.
Giving certain notices to persons who became residents before July 1, 1981.

Any person who became a resident before July 1, 1981, shall receive the notices required under Code Section 31-8-104; paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of subsection (a) of Code Section 31-8-106; subsection (a) of Code Section 31-8-110; and paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of Code Section 31-8-115 no later than September 30, 1981.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1919B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1.

31-8-106.
Information to be provided residents upon admission; list of current rates and services; bill for charges; access to nonmedical records.

At the time of admission, the facility must provide the resident with:

A written notice of the facility’s basic daily or monthly rates;

A written statement of all facility services, including those offered on a needed basis, and related charges, including any extra charges for services not covered under medicare or Medicaid or by the facility’s basic daily or monthly rate;

A statement disclosing the facility’s name and business address and the name and business address of the administrator of the facility. Upon request an applicant or resident shall be furnished with a copy of the annual disclosure statement filed with the Department of Community Health; and

Notice of the right of access to the written policies and procedures of the facilities. Access to these policies and procedures shall be permitted during ordinary business hours.

Upon a resident’s request, the facility must provide that resident with a current list of all services and charges. Current charges must be posted in a conspicuous location.

The facility must inform each resident in writing, at least 30 days in advance of the effective date, of any changes in rates or the services that these rates cover.

A facility must bill for charges at least once a month unless otherwise agreed. Each bill must itemize charges for:

The daily or monthly rate; and

All extra charges.

Each resident or guardian shall be permitted to inspect and receive a copy of the resident’s nonmedical records kept by the facility. The facility may charge a reasonable fee for duplication, which fee shall not exceed actual cost.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1913B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24.

31-8-107.
Refusal of admission or continued residence on the basis of history or condition of mental or physical disease or disability.

Each resident or person requesting admission to a facility shall be free from discrimination by the facility through its refusing admission or continued residency on the basis of the resident’s or applicant’s history or condition of mental or physical disease or disability, unless such admission would cause the facility or any resident to lose eligibility for any state or federal program of financial assistance or unless the facility cannot provide adequate and appropriate care, treatment, and services to the resident due to such disease or disability.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1910B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1.

31-8-108.
Required care, treatment, and services; rights in regard thereto; experimental research or treatment.

Each resident shall receive care, treatment, and services which are adequate and appropriate. Care, treatment, and services shall be provided as follows:

With reasonable care and skill;

In compliance with applicable laws and regulations;

Without discrimination in the quality of a service based on the source of payment for the service;

With respect for the resident’s personal dignity and privacy; and

With the goal of the resident’s return home or to another environment less restrictive than the facility.

In the provision of care, treatment, and services to the resident by the facility, each resident or guardian shall be entitled to the following:

To choose the resident’s physician. The physician so chosen shall inform the resident in advance whether or not the physician’s fees can be paid from public or private benefits to which the resident is entitled and shall provide such documentation as may be required by law or regulation;

To participate in the overall planning of the resident’s care and treatment. The resident or guardian shall be informed of this right each time a substantial change in the treatment plan is made;

To refuse medical treatment, dietary restrictions, and medications for the resident. The resident or guardian shall be informed of the probable consequences of such refusal, the refusal shall be noted in the resident’s medical records, and the resident’s attending physician shall be notified as soon as practical. If such refusal apparently would be seriously harmful to the health or safety of the resident, the facility shall either refer the resident to a hospital or notify a responsible family member or, if such a family member is not readily available, the county department of family and children services. If such refusal would be harmful to the health or safety of others, as documented in the resident’s medical records by the resident’s physician, this subsection shall not apply. Any facility or employee of such facility which complies with this paragraph shall not be liable for any damages resulting from such refusal;

To receive from the facility upon the request of the resident, guardian, or representative the name, address, and telephone number of the resident’s physician;

To have any significant change in the resident’s health status reported to persons of his choice by the facility within a reasonable time; and

To obtain from the resident’s physician or the physician attached to the facility a complete and current explanation concerning the resident’s medical diagnosis, treatment, and prognosis in language the resident can understand. Each resident shall have access to all information in the medical records of the resident and shall be permitted to inspect and receive a copy of such records unless medically contraindicated. The facility may charge a reasonable fee for duplication, which fee shall not exceed actual cost.

Each resident shall be free from experimental research or treatment unless the informed, written consent of the resident or guardian is first obtained.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1914B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1.

Cross references.

Consent for surgical or medical treatment generally, T. 31, C. 9.

31-8-109.
Use or threat of physical restraints, isolation, or restrictions on mobility.

Each resident shall be free from actual or threatened physical restraints, isolation, or restrictions on mobility within or outside the facility grounds, including the use of drugs to limit mobility, except to the minimum extent necessary to protect the resident from immediate injury to the resident or to others. In no event shall restraints, restrictions, or isolation be used for punishment, incentive, behavior conditioning or modification, or for the convenience of the facility.

Restraints, restrictions, or isolation shall be used only subject to the following conditions:

Prior to authorizing restraints, restrictions, or isolation, the attending physician shall make a personal examination and individualized determination of the need to use such restraints, restriction, or isolation on that resident and shall specify a reasonable time for such use. No restraint, restriction, or isolation shall be used by the facility longer than 65 days for intermediate care residents and longer than 35 days for skilled nursing residents, except by reorder of the attending physician after personal examination of the resident. Irrespective of such time period specified, restraints, restrictions, or isolation shall not be used beyond the period of actual need;

In an emergency situation, restraints, restrictions, or isolation shall be authorized by the person in charge only to protect the resident from immediate injury to the resident or others and shall not be continued for more than 12 hours after the onset of the emergency without personal examination and authorization by the attending physician;

The resident and a person designated by the resident, if any, shall be informed immediately of the need for the use of restraint, restriction, or isolation, the reasons for such use, and the time the physician has specified for such use. Such information shall be recorded in the resident’s file;

A restrained or isolated resident shall be monitored by the staff at least every hour and released and exercised at least every two hours, except during normal sleeping hours; and

When a restraint, restriction, or isolation is used under this Code section, the resident shall retain all rights enumerated in this article.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1916B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1.

31-8-110.
Right to select pharmacy or pharmacist; charges for pharmaceutical supplies and services; information as to purpose and effects of drugs.

Each resident or guardian shall be permitted to select the pharmacy or pharmacist of his choice for those pharmaceutical supplies and services not provided by the facility as a part of the basic rate. However, if the facility under its policies or procedures utilizes a specific type of unit dose system, such pharmacy or pharmacist must provide pharmaceuticals under such system. The resident or guardian shall be informed in writing at the time of admission of the resident as to which pharmaceutical supplies and services are not so provided.

No person shall be discriminated against as to admission or continued residency on the basis of the person’s choice of pharmacy, pharmacist, or both.

Subject to the resident’s choice of pharmacy or pharmacist, each resident shall receive pharmaceutical supplies and services at reasonable prices not exceeding applicable and normally accepted prices for comparably packaged pharmaceutical supplies and services within the community.

Each resident or guardian shall, on his request, be informed of the identity, purpose, and possible reactions to each drug to be administered.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1915B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1.

Cross references.

Pharmacists and pharmacies generally, T. 26, C. 4.

31-8-111.
Rights as citizen.

Each resident shall be encouraged and assisted by the facility to exercise all rights, benefits, and privileges as a citizen including, but not limited to, the following:

The right to vote. Residents who are eligible to vote shall have the right to vote in primary, special, and general elections and in referendums. The facility shall permit and reasonably assist residents to obtain voter registration forms, applications for absentee ballots, and absentee ballots and to comply with other requirements which are prerequisites for voting;

The right to free exercise of religion as well as freedom from imposition of religious beliefs or practices;

The right to associate, meet, and communicate privately with persons of the resident’s choice; and

The right to participate, inside and outside the facility, in social, family, religious, and community group activities.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1907B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 31/HB 942.

Cross references.

Registration of voters, §

21-2-210

et seq.

31-8-112.
Freedom from duty to perform services for facility; right to rise and retire at times of resident’s choice; tobacco and alcoholic beverages; freedom to enter and leave facility.

Each resident shall be free from a duty to perform services for the facility.

Each resident shall be permitted to rise and retire at times of his choice, if the resident does not interfere with the rights of others.

Unless contradictory to written admission policies of which the resident, guardian, or representative is informed prior to admission, each resident shall be permitted to use tobacco and to consume alcoholic beverages, subject to the facility’s policies and safety rules and applicable state law, if the resident does not interfere with the rights of others.

Each resident shall be free to enter and leave the facility as the resident chooses.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1908B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1.

31-8-113.
Right to retain and use personal property at facility; provision of secure storage space for such property; records of stored property; investigation of complaints of theft.

Each resident shall be permitted to retain and use his personal property, including funds and clothing, in his immediate living quarters as space permits.

Upon request, the facility shall provide a means of securing the resident’s property in his room or in any other secured part of the facility so long as the resident has access to such property on weekdays and, where facility policy allows, on weekends and holidays. Each facility shall keep a record of all personal property deposited within a secured part of the facility.

The facility shall develop procedures for investigating complaints concerning thefts of residents’ property and shall promptly investigate all such complaints and report the results of its investigation to the complainant.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1909B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1.

31-8-114.
Right to privacy.

Each resident shall enjoy the right of privacy including, but not limited to, the following:

The right to privacy in the resident’s room or the resident’s portion of the room. The staff may not enter a resident’s room without making their presence known, except when the resident is asleep, in an emergency threatening the health or safety of the resident, or as required by the resident’s care plan;

The right to a private room and a personal sitter if the resident pays the difference between the facility’s charge for such a room and sitter and the amount reimbursed through medicare or Medicaid;

The right to private visits with the resident’s spouse. Spouses shall be permitted to share a room when available where both are residents of the facility;

The right to have unimpeded, private, and uncensored communication with anyone of the resident’s choice by mail, public telephone, and visitation, provided that such visitation does not disturb other residents. The administrator shall provide that mail is received and mailed on regular postal delivery days, that telephones are accessible for confidential and private communications, and that at least one private place per facility is available for visits during normal visitation hours, which shall be for at least 12 continuous hours per day;

The right to refuse acceptance of correspondence, telephone calls, or visitation by anyone;

The right to respect and privacy in his medical, personal, and bodily care program. Each resident’s case discussion, consultation, examination, treatment, and care shall be confidential and shall be conducted in privacy. Those persons not directly involved in the resident’s care must have the resident’s permission to be present; and

The right to receive confidential treatment of the resident’s personal and medical records. Only the resident or guardian may approve the release or disclosure of such records to any individual outside the facility, except in case of (A) the resident’s transfer to another health care facility, (B) during a medicare, Medicaid, licensure, medical care foundation, or peer review survey, or (C) as otherwise provided by law or third-party payment contract.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1911B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31.

31-8-115.
Use of payments made to or on behalf of a resident; right of resident or his guardian to manage the resident’s financial affairs; assistance by facility in such management.

Any payments made to or on behalf of a resident, regardless of the payee, shall be used exclusively for the resident’s benefit, unless otherwise required by law.

Each resident or his guardian shall be permitted to manage the financial affairs of the resident and to withdraw and use funds from any personal account established for him at the facility. The resident or his guardian may authorize the administrator or other person employed by the facility to assist in the management of such resident’s financial affairs, either wholly or partially, subject to the following conditions:

Such authorization must be in writing and maintained in the resident’s files;

Resident’s funds shall be expended by the facility only with prior written consent or upon the immediate request of the resident or guardian;

The resident, his guardian, or representative shall be given any portion or all of the resident’s funds upon the request of the resident or guardian;

A current written record of all financial arrangements and transactions involving the resident’s funds shall be maintained and made available to the resident or guardian for inspection and copying upon request. A written statement showing the current balance and an itemized listing of all transactions shall be provided to each resident or guardian at least quarterly and prior to any change in ownership of the facility;

Funds received from a resident or on his behalf may be deposited in an interest-bearing account, but in any event all funds not needed for ordinary use by residents on a daily basis shall be deposited in an account insured by agencies of or corporations chartered by the state or federal government and in a form which clearly indicates that the facility has only a fiduciary interest in the funds. Any interest earned on such account shall accrue to the resident; and

Each facility shall obtain an irrevocable letter of credit from a bank or savings and loan association, as defined in Code Section 7-1-4, or purchase a surety bond at least in the amount of the funds to guarantee the security of residents’ funds.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1912B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1129, § 1.

Law reviews.

For note on 1991 amendment of this Code section, see 8 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 74 (1992).

31-8-116.
Involuntary transfer of residents discharged from facility; return to facility after transfer.

Except in an emergency, where the resident or other residents are subject to an imminent and substantial danger that only immediate transfer or discharge will relieve or reduce, a facility may involuntarily transfer a resident only in the following situations and after other reasonable alternatives to transfer have been exhausted:

A physician determines that failure to transfer the resident will threaten the health or safety of the resident or others and documents that determination in the resident’s medical record. If the physician determines that the facility cannot provide care, treatment, and services which are adequate and appropriate, it shall be conclusively presumed that the failure to transfer will threaten the health or safety of the resident. If the basis for the transfer or discharge is the safety of the resident himself, the resident shall not be involuntarily transferred or discharged unless a physician determines that such transfer or discharge is not reasonably expected to endanger the resident to a greater extent than remaining in the facility and documents that determination in the resident’s medical records;

The facility does not participate in or voluntarily or involuntarily ceases to operate or participate in the program which reimburses the cost of the resident’s care;

Nonpayment of allowable fees has occurred. The conversion of a resident from private pay status to Medicaid eligibility due to exhaustion of personal financial resources or from medicare to Medicaid does not constitute nonpayment of fees under this paragraph; or

When the findings of a medicare or Medicaid medical necessity review determine that the resident no longer requires the level of care provided at the facility.

If the facility voluntarily or involuntarily ceases to operate or participate in the program which reimburses the costs of the resident’s care, the facility must cooperate fully with the state Medicaid agency and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services regional office in the implementation of any transfer planning and transfer counseling conducted by these agencies.

The facility shall assist the resident and guardian in finding a reasonably appropriate alternative placement prior to the proposed transfer or discharge. The plan for such transfer or discharge shall be designed to mitigate the effects of transfer stress to the resident. Such plan shall include counseling the resident, guardian, or representative regarding available community resources and informing the appropriate state or social service organization.

The facility must notify the resident, guardian or representative, and attending physician at least 30 days before any involuntary transfer, except a transfer pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section. This notice must be in writing and must contain:

The reasons for the proposed transfer;

The effective date of the proposed transfer;

Notice of the right to a hearing pursuant to Code Section 31-8-125 and of the right to representation by legal counsel; and

The location to which the facility proposes to transfer the resident.

The resident shall receive at least 15 days’ notice prior to an involuntary intrafacility transfer.

If two residents in a facility are married and the facility proposes to transfer involuntarily one spouse to another facility at a similar level of care, the facility must give the other spouse notice of his or her right to be transferred to the same facility. If the spouse notifies a facility in writing that he wishes to be transferred, the facility must transfer both spouses on the same day, pending availability of accommodations.

Each resident shall be discharged from a facility after the resident or guardian gives the administrator or person in charge of the facility notice of the resident’s desire to be discharged and the date of the expected departure. Where the resident appears to be incapable of living independently of the facility, the facility shall notify the Department of Human Services in order to obtain social or protective assistance for the resident immediately. The notice of the discharge by the resident or guardian, the expected and actual date thereof, and notice to the department, where required, shall be documented in the resident’s records. Upon such discharge and, if required, notice to the department, the facility is relieved from any further responsibility for the resident’s care, safety, or well-being.

Whenever allowed by the resident’s health condition, a resident shall be provided treatment and care, rehabilitative services, and assistance by the facility to prepare the resident to return to the resident’s home or other living situation less restrictive than the facility. Upon the request of the resident, guardian, or representative, the facility shall provide him with information regarding available resources and inform him of the appropriate state or social service organizations.

Each resident transferred from a facility to a hospital, other health care facility, or trial alternative living placement shall have the right to return to the facility immediately upon discharge from the hospital or other health care facility or upon termination of the trial living placement, provided that the resident has continued to pay the facility or third-party payment is provided for the period of the resident’s absence. In cases of nonpayment to the facility during such absence, a resident who requests to return to a facility from a hospital shall be admitted by the facility to the first bed available after discharge from the hospital.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1917B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 31; Ga. L. 2005, p. 509, § 8/HB 394; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, an extra “the” was deleted preceding “Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services” in subsection (b).

31-8-117.
Suspension of certain rights where exercise poses danger to self or other residents; notice of suspension; duration.

Only the rights enumerated in paragraph (6) of subsection (b) of Code Section 31-8-108 and subsections (b), (c), and (d) of Code Section 31-8-112 may be suspended as a result of medical contraindication, as determined by the resident’s physician, and then only under the following conditions:

The physician has personally examined the resident and the physician documents that the exercise of such right or rights pose a danger to other residents or an immediate and substantial danger to the resident himself. If the threatened danger is only to the resident, the resident’s rights shall not be suspended pursuant to this Code section, provided the resident or guardian understands the danger and insists on the exercise of the right;

Prior to or at the time of a suspension of a right or rights due to a medical contraindication, the resident and his guardian or representative shall be notified of such suspension, its duration, and the resident’s legal right to meet with legal counsel, the ombudsman provided for in Article 3 of this chapter, members of his family, his guardian, or others of his choice; and

Suspension of a right or rights shall be for a reasonable time period, which period shall not exceed 35 days for skilled nursing residents and not to exceed 65 days for intermediate care residents. Every additional period, which periods shall also not exceed the same maximum time periods, shall be considered a new suspension, subject to the conditions of paragraphs (1) and (2) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1918B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1.

31-8-118.
Freedom from interference in exercise of rights and pursuit of interests; accommodation of conflicting rights; voicing of complaints and recommendation of changes.

The facility must permit each resident to exercise the rights and pursue the interests described in this chapter without restraint, interference, coercion, discrimination, or reprisal from the facility.

The facility must exercise judgment in situations which pose a threat to the health or safety of a resident, and when necessary, must achieve a reasonable accommodation of conflicting rights of residents.

Each resident shall be permitted to voice complaints and recommend changes in policies, procedures, and services to the administrator, his designee, or the residents’ council.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1919B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1.

31-8-119.
Obtaining contributions by coercion; use of contributions designated for a restricted purpose; receipts and records of contributions.

No resident nor any resident’s family, guardian, or representative shall be coerced by any means into giving contributions. When contributions are freely made by the resident or resident’s family, guardian, or representative for a restricted purpose, such contribution must be used for the purpose so designated. A receipt shall be provided for all contributions and a central record of such receipts shall be maintained at the facility.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1919B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 31.

31-8-120.
Visitors; right of access.

Visitors must be granted access to residents, who have the right to refuse or terminate any visit. The facility must permit the resident’s representatives and representatives of any federally mandated ombudsman or advocacy program to have access to the resident. Access under this Code section shall be allowed during normal visitation hours.

Each person entering a facility shall promptly disclose his presence and identity to the person in charge and shall enter the immediate living quarters of a resident only after identifying himself and receiving permission to enter. Such person shall leave immediately upon the resident’s request. The rights of other residents in the room and in the facility shall be respected.

The administrator or person in charge of a facility may refuse access as described in this Code section or require a person to leave a facility only if he has reason to believe that the presence of the person seeking access would result in severe harm to any resident’s health, safety, or property; if the access is sought for financial solicitation or for commercial purposes; or if such access is refused by the resident.

This Code section shall not limit the power of any public agency, ombudsman under Article 3 of this chapter, or other person permitted or required by law to enter and inspect a facility.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1920B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1.

31-8-121.
Formation of residents’ council; space for meetings; assistance in attending meetings; compelling of attendance or participation.

The facility must permit the formation of a residents’ council by interested residents, provide space for meetings, and provide assistance in attending meetings to those residents who require it. The facility may not compel attendance at or participation in residents’ council meetings.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1920B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1.

31-8-122.
Compliance with this article by facilities; establishment by facilities of written policies and procedures; familiarization of facility staff with this article.

Each facility shall establish written policies and procedures in accordance with this article and shall provide for the implementation and continuing compliance with this article. In addition, each facility must comply with all other applicable state laws and regulations.

Each facility shall conduct training for all staff on a quarterly basis to provide that its staff is familiar with this article and understands the obligation to provide care for residents consistent with this article at all times.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1904B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1.

31-8-123.
Use of state or community ombudsman to resolve residents’ complaints.

Every effort shall be made to use the state ombudsman or community ombudsman, as provided for in Article 3 of this chapter, to resolve complaints related to residents’ rights.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1903B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1.

31-8-124.
Grievances.

Any resident, guardian, or representative who believes his rights under this article have been violated by a facility shall be permitted to file a grievance under this Code section.

To initiate the grievance, the resident, guardian, or representative may submit an oral or written complaint to the administrator or his designee. The administrator or his designee shall act to resolve the complaint or shall respond to the complaint within three business days, including in the response a description of the review and appeal rights set forth in this Code section.

If the person filing the complaint is not satisfied by the action taken by the administrator or his designee, the complainant shall submit an oral or written complaint to the state or community ombudsman, pursuant to Article 3 of this chapter.

If the ombudsman does not resolve the grievance to the complainant’s satisfaction within ten days, the complainant may submit the grievance to an impartial referee, jointly chosen by the administrator or his designee and the complainant, who will conduct a hearing.

The referee’s hearing shall be held at the facility within 14 days after submission of the grievance to him, at a time convenient to the referee, the complainant, and the administrator. The complainant and the administrator may review relevant records and documents, present evidence, call witnesses, cross-examine witnesses, make oral arguments, and be represented by any person of their choice. The referee may ask questions of any person, review relevant records and documents, call witnesses, and receive other evidence as appropriate. The referee shall keep a record of the proceedings, which record may be a sound recording. Within 72 hours after the grievance review, the referee shall render a decision and shall give to the complainant and to the administrator a written statement of the decision and reasons therefor, which statement shall also describe the appeal rights set forth in Code Section 31-8-125. Such decision shall be binding on the parties unless reversed upon appeal.

The facility shall maintain a central file of documents pertaining to grievances, such file to be confidential, except that any resident, guardian, or representative may review any document pertaining to the resident and all documents shall be available to the department for inspection. This subsection shall not apply to any documents protected by the attorney-client privilege.

If a resident or complainant is unable for any reason to understand any writing or communication pertinent to this Code section, such information shall be communicated to him in a manner that takes into account any communication impairment he may have.

A resident, guardian, or representative who elects not to proceed under this Code section shall not be prohibited from proceeding under Code Section 31-8-125 or 31-8-126.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1921B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1.

31-8-125.
Administrative hearings.

Any resident, guardian, or representative who believes his rights under Code Section 31-8-107, paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of Code Section 31-8-108, Code Section 31-8-109, paragraphs (3) and (4) of Code Section 31-8-111, subsection (d) of Code Section 31-8-112, Code Section 31-8-116, Code Section 31-8-117, or Code Section 31-8-120 have been violated or any complainant or facility dissatisfied with a decision of a referee shall have the right to request a hearing from the department pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The department is authorized to hold such hearings and, in the case of an appeal of a decision of a referee, the department may hold such hearings by review of the record.

The hearing shall be conducted within 45 days of the receipt by the department of the request for a hearing. Except where the state or community ombudsman has already been involved in the matter at issue, the department may refer the complaint to the state or community ombudsman for informal resolution pending the hearing.

Except in the event of an emergency situation in which the resident or other residents are subject to imminent and substantial danger that only immediate transfer will relieve or reduce or except in case of nonpayment, no transfer shall take place until all appeal rights are exhausted.

The department shall hold such hearings at the facility upon the resident’s request or as necessary due to the resident’s medical condition. Where residents of a facility allege a common complaint, the department may at the residents’ request schedule a single hearing.

If the department finds no violations of this article, the resident and facility will be so informed. If a violation has occurred, the department shall order the facility to correct such violation; and, upon failure to correct such violation within a reasonable time, the department may impose appropriate civil penalties as provided for in Code Section 31-8-126.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1922B, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 149, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31.